North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 2. Filing Documents.

§ 55A-1-20.
Filing requirements.

A document required or permitted by this Chapter to be filed by the Secretary of State must be filed under Chapter 55D of the General Statutes.

A document submitted on behalf of a domestic or foreign corporation must be executed:

By the presiding officer of its board of directors, by its president, or by another of its officers;

If directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1967, c. 13, s. 2; c. 823, s. 21; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 2; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1999-369, s. 2.1; 2001-358, s. 7(a); 2001-387, ss. 32, 155, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 55A-1-21.
Forms.

The Secretary of State may promulgate and furnish on request forms for:

An application for a certificate of existence;

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this State;

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of withdrawal;

Designation of Principal Office Address; and

Corporation’s Statement of Change of Principal Office.

If the Secretary of State so requires, use of these forms is mandatory.

The Secretary of State may promulgate and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by this Chapter but their use is not mandatory.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 539, s. 9.

§ 55A-1-22.
Filing, service, and copying fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered to the Secretary for filing:

Click to view

The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) each time process is served on the Secretary under this Chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for copying, comparing, and certifying a copy of any filed document relating to a domestic or foreign corporation:

One dollar ($1.00) a page for copying or comparing a copy to the original.

Fifteen dollars ($15.00) for a paper certificate.

Ten dollars ($10.00) for an electronic certificate.

Document Fee (1) Articles of incorporation $60.00 (2) Application for reserved name $10.00 (3) Notice of transfer of reserved name $10.00 (4) Application for registered name $10.00 (5) Application for renewal of registered name $10.00 (6) Corporation’s statement of change of registered agent or registered office or both $ 5.00 (7) Agent’s statement of change of registered office for each affected corporation $ 5.00 (8) Agent’s statement of resignation No fee (9) Designation of registered agent or registered office or both $ 5.00 (10) Amendment of articles of incorporation $25.00 (11) Restated articles of incorporation without amendment of articles $10.00 (12) Restated articles of incorporation with amendment of articles $25.00 (13) Articles of merger $25.00 (14) Articles of dissolution $15.00 (15) Articles of revocation of dissolution $10.00 (16) Certificate of administrative dissolution No fee (17) Application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution $100.00 (18) Certificate of reinstatement No fee (19) Certificate of judicial dissolution No fee (20) Application for certificate of authority $125.00 (21) Application for amended certificate of authority $25.00 (22) Application for certificate of withdrawal $10.00 (23) Certificate of revocation of authority to conduct affairs No fee (24) Corporation’s Statement of Change of Principal Office $5.00 (24a) Designation of Principal Office Address $5.00 (25) Articles of correction $10.00 (26) Application for certificate of existence or authorization (paper) $15.00 (26a) Application for certificate of existence or authorization (electronic) $10.00 (27) Any other document required or permitted to be filed by this Chapter $10.00 (28) Repealed by Session Laws , effective January 1, 2002. 2001-358, s. 7(c)

History.

1957, c. 1179; 1967, c. 823, s. 24; 1969, c. 875, s. 10; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 981, s. 2; 1983, c. 713, ss. 39-42; 1991, c. 574, s. 2; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 539, s. 10; 1997-456, s. 55.3; 1997-475, s. 5.2; 1997-485, s. 11; 2001-358, s. 7(c); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2002-126, ss. 29A.27, 29A.28.

North Carolina Commentary

This section contains a new fee schedule covering documents required or permitted to be filed under the Act. The fees shown here combine the fees and taxes that were separately covered in former G.S. 55A-77 and G.S. 55A-78.

§§ 55A-1-22.1 through 55A-1-27.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 7(b), effective January 1, 2002.

§ 55A-1-28.
Certificate of existence.

Anyone may apply to the Secretary of State to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic corporation or a certificate of authorization for a foreign corporation.

A certificate of existence or authorization sets forth:

The domestic corporation’s corporate name or the foreign corporation’s name used in this State;

That the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this State, the date of its incorporation, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual; or that the foreign corporation is authorized to conduct affairs in this State;

That the articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation or the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation has not been suspended for failure to comply with the Revenue Act of this State and that the corporation has not been administratively dissolved for failure to comply with the provisions of this Chapter;

Repealed by Session Laws c. 539, s. 14.

That articles of dissolution have not been filed; and

Other facts of record in the office of the Secretary of State that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or authorization issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in existence or is authorized to conduct affairs in this State.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 539, s. 14.

§ 55A-1-29.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 7(b), effective January 1, 2002.